Hawaii, session 2026, GM1369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 302A-801, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (f) to read as follows:
3 "(f) The board may employ an executive director for a term
4 of up to four years, who shall be appointed by the board of
5 education, with the advice and consent of the senate, and
6 without regard to chapters 76 and 89; provided that the board of
7 education shall appoint the executive director from a list of
8 three nominees submitted by the board [shall oubmit a nominee]
9 to the board of education ;
10 provided further that if the senate fails to confirm the nominee
11 [io disapproved], the board of education shall submit another
12 nominee to the [board of -education] senate for [approval er
13 disapproval.] advice and consent.
14 The board may terminate the executive director's contract
15 for cause; provided that the board shall submit the
16 recommendation for termination to the board of education for
17 approval or disapproval."
2026-2540 SB3262 CDl SMA.docx
iniiiniiiiiiiiiHiiniH

Page 2 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
1 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
2 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
3 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2540 SB3262 CDl SMA.docx 2

3262
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this day of , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 3262, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senati
Clerk of the Senate
72-26

SB No. 3262, SD 1, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives